District of Columbia statutes.
47-4658

Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments; Lot 808, Square 5041 and Lot 811, Square 5056.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the real property described as Lot 808, Square 5041 and Lot 811, Square 5056, which is owned by Parkside Residential, LLC, and known as the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments, shall be allowed an annual real property tax abatement equal to the amount of the real property taxes assessed and imposed by Chapter 8 of this title of up to a total maximum amount for both lots of $600,000 per year for 10 property tax years commencing for Lot 808 and for Lot 811 at the beginning of the first month following the date the lot is issued a final certificate of occupancy (“commencement date”) and ending for each lot at the end of the 10th full real property tax year following the lot’s commencement date.

(b)

The real property tax abatement authorized by this section shall expire for the lot, or lots, whichever the case may be, that has not been issued a final certificate of occupancy by September 20, 2018, and an abatement pursuant to this section shall not be allowed.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and provided that the final certificate of occupancy is issued on or before September 20, 2018, upon the issuance of a final certificate for Lot 808 or Lot 811, any fees or deposits charged to and paid by Parkside Residential, LLC, related to that lot for the development of Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments, including private space or building permit fees or public space permit fees (“related fees”), shall be refunded and any prospective related fees forgiven.

(d)

The tax abatements and fees and deposits exemptions provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments.

History

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-255, § 2(b), 60 DCR 987

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of this section (originally designated as § 47-4645), see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Temporary Act of 2012 (D.C. Law 19-245, Mar. 19, 2013, 60 DCR 101).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-251, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 1876).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments TaxAbatement Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-87, Mar. 9, 2016, 63 DCR 792).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section (originally designated as § 47-4645), see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Emergency Act of 2012, (D.C. Act 19-556, December 2, 2012, 59 DCR 14782).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(b) of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-15, March 1, 2013, 60 DCR 3966, 20 DCSTAT 469).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-255, § 3, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-255, § 3, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-526, Dec. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 13117, 20 STAT 4443).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-45, Mar. 31, 2015, 62 DCR 4568, 21 DCSTAT 877).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Parkside Parcel E and J Mixed-Income Apartments Tax Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-241, Dec. 21, 2015, 63 DCR 13).

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-255 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7009 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-255, § 3.